South Dakota, session 2026, HB1046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Department of Corrections may demolish the Pierre Minimum Center, Pierre,
South Dakota, and remove and dispose of fixtures and structures, abate any hazardous
materials, and take any action reasonably necessary to restore the site to grade.
Section 2. There is appropriated $682,825 from the general fund, to the Department of
Corrections, for the purposes described in section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. The project authorized in section 1 of this Act shall be under the general charge
and supervision of the Bureau of Human Resources and Administration, as provided in chapter
5-14.
Section 4. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 5. The secretary of the Department of Corrections shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized by this Act.
Section 6. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.559.12 2 1046
An Act to authorize the Department of Corrections to demolish the Pierre Minimum Center, to
make an appropriation therefor, and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1046
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1046 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1046 ENROLLED